Washington statutes.
RCW 2.16.050

Annual meeting.

The association shall meet annually at a time established by the association's governing board. At the meeting officers shall be chosen for the ensuing year, and other business transacted as may properly come before the association.

[ 1996 c 82 s 1; 1955 c 38 s 10; 1933 ex.s. c 58 s 5; RRS s 11051-5.]